testing/sms-test-V-aaveed.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: sms/bin/sms-gen.hfstol
    Morph: sms/bin/sms.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: sms/bin/isms.fst
    Morph: sms/bin/sms.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ää´veed: # Verb 'to open' - full paradigm
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ää´vääm
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ää´vääk
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ää´vad
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ää´veep
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ää´vve´ted
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ää´vee 
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prs+4: ää´veet
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ää´veem
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ää´viiǩ
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ää´vii
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [ää´viim, ää´viin]
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ää´viid
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ää´vee
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prt+4: ää´veeš
     ää´veed+V+Pot+Sg1: ää´ve´žem
     ää´veed+V+Pot+Sg2: ää´ve´žiǩ
     ää´veed+V+Pot+Sg3: ää´veež
     ää´veed+V+Pot+Pl1: [ää´ve´žep, ää´ve´žim]
     ää´veed+V+Pot+Pl2: ää´ve´žid 
     ää´veed+V+Pot+Pl3: ää´ve´že
     ää´veed+V+Pot+4: ää´ve´žet
     ää´veed+V+Pot+ConNeg: ää´ve´že
     ää´veed+V+Cond+Sg1: ää´ve´čem
     ää´veed+V+Cond+Sg2: ää´ve´čiǩ
     ää´veed+V+Cond+Sg3: ää´ve´či
     ää´veed+V+Cond+Pl1: [ää´ve´čim, ää´ve´čep]
     ää´veed+V+Cond+Pl2: ää´ve´čid
     ää´veed+V+Cond+Pl3: ää´ve´če
     ää´veed+V+Cond+4: ää´ve´češ
     ää´veed+V+Cond+ConNeg: ää´ve´če
     ää´veed+V+Imp+Sg2: ää´ved
     ää´veed+V+Imp+Sg3: ää´vââǥǥas
     ää´veed+V+Imp+Pl1: ää´vâkap
     ää´veed+V+Imp+Pl2: ää´ve´ǩed
     ää´veed+V+Imp+Pl3: ää´vâkaz
     ää´veed+V+Imp+ConNeg: ää´vukku
     ää´veed+V+ActEss: ää´ve´men
     ää´veed+V+Action: ää´veem
     ää´veed+V+PrsPrc: ää´veei
     ää´veed+V+PrfPrc: ää´vääm
     ää´veed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [ää´vummu, ää´vuum]
     ää´veed+V+VAbess: ää´veǩâni
     ää´veed+V+GerTemp: ää´veen
     ää´veed+V+GerInstr: ää´vee´l
